District of Columbia statutes.
32-1406

Apprenticeship committees.

(a)

Local joint apprenticeship committees and non-joint apprenticeship committees in any trade or group of trades may be submitted to the Registration Agency for approval. Such apprenticeship committees shall be composed of an equal number of employer and employee representatives appointed by the groups or organizations they represent, or the committee may consist of the employer and not fewer than 2 representatives from the recognized bargaining agency.

(b)

In a trade or group of trades in which there is no bona fide employee organization, the Registration Agency, with the advice and guidance of the Apprenticeship Council, may approve a joint trade apprenticeship committee and a non-joint apprenticeship committee (also referred to as a unilateral or group non-joint committee).

(c)

Subject to the approval of the Registration Agency, and in accordance with standards established by or under authority of this subchapter, joint trade apprenticeship committees and non-joint apprenticeship committees may develop standards to govern the training of apprentices and give such aid as may be necessary to effectuate the standards.

May 21, 1946, 60 Stat. 205, ch. 267, § 6
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2012(f), 62 DCR 10905
1981 Ed., § 36-407.
1973 Ed., § 36-126.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 20-256, Apr. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 2259).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-579, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1258, 21 STAT 724).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(f) of the Apprenticeship Modernization Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-16, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3847, 21 DCSTAT 843).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2012(f) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).